Colorado, session 2026A, SB156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend with relocated
provisions 24-46.3-100.3 as follows:
24-46.3-100.3. Definitions.
As used in this article 46.3, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(a)] "Apprenticeship" means a
registered apprenticeship program with a written plan that is designed to
move an apprentice from a low- or no-skill entry-level position to full
occupational proficiency. The program must comply with the parameters
established under the FEDERAL "National Apprenticeship Act", 29 U.S.C.
sec. 50, as amended, and regulations promulgated under the act, and must
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

be administered by the United States department of labor's office of
apprenticeship LABOR or a state apprenticeship agency recognized by the
United States department of labor. An individual business, an employer
association, or a labor organization sponsors a registered apprenticeship.
Upon finishing a training program, the apprentice earns a "completion of
registered apprenticeship" certificate, which is an industry-issued and
nationally recognized credential that validates proficiency in an
apprenticeable occupation, or is awarded a certificate of completion.
(2) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(b)] "Career pathway" means a series
of connected education and training strategies and support services that
enable individuals AN INDIVIDUAL to secure industry-relevant skills and OR
certification where applicable, to obtain employment within an occupational
area, and to advance to higher levels of future education and employment.
(3) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(b.5)] "Certificate of completion"
means a certificate awarded to an apprentice in recognition of the successful
completion of an apprenticeship program.
(1) (4) "Department" means the department of labor and
employment.
(2) (5) "Federal act" means the federal "Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act", 29 U.S.C. sec. 3101 et seq.
(6) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(d)] "Growing industries" means
industries that are:
(a) Projected to create new jobs annually for at least the next ten
years; OR
(b) ALIGNED WITH THE STATE'S ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STRATEGY.
(7) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(e)] "Partners" means, at a minimum,
state agencies and organizations described in section 24-46.3-103, the state
board for community colleges and occupational education created in section
23-60-104, C.R.S., and interested postsecondary education providers.
(3) (8) "State council" means the state work force development
council created in section 24-46.3-101 (1).
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-156

(9) [Formerly 24-46.3-104 (2)(g)] "Top jobs" means jobs that have
strong projected average openings per year for ten years and pay a living
HIGH wage as defined in the Colorado talent pipeline report prepared
pursuant to section 24-46.3-103.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-46.3-103 as
follows:
24-46.3-103. Growing industries and in-demand occupations
talent pipeline working group - annual Colorado talent report -
legislative declaration.
(1) (a) The general assembly hereby finds determines, and declares
that:
(I) Colorado's economy is diverse and constantly changing, and its
key GROWING industries are dependent on an accurately APPROPRIATELY
skilled workforce to continue to thrive;
(II) Colorado's key GROWING industry employers continue to lack
the skilled workers they need to stay and grow in the state;
(III) THESE CONTINUOUSLY UNFILLED ROLES IN GROWING
INDUSTRIES CONSTITUTE IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS IN COLORADO, AND IT
IS IMPERATIVE TO THE STATE'S COMMUNITIES AND ECONOMY THAT THERE IS
A PUBLIC UNDERSTANDING OF HOW TO:
(A) DETERMINE WHICH OCCUPATIONS ARE IN-DEMAND; AND
(B) ACCESS TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES FOR JOB PLACEMENT IN
IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS;
(III) (IV) Coloradans miss opportunities for good jobs in growing
industries because they do not have access to the right education, training,
or adequate hands-on experience at the right time to secure employment IN
IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS;
(IV) (V) Providing clear access to industry-driven career pathways
for education and employment advancement can result in long-term
improvements in the economic well-being of Coloradans and will provide
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-156

industries with the talent pipeline needed to thrive now and in the future
MAINTAINING A COORDINATED STRATEGY ACROSS STATE AGENCIES TO
PROMOTE ACCESS TO INDUSTRY-DRIVEN CAREER PATHWAYS IS CRITICAL TO
SUPPORTING THE ECONOMIC WELL-BEING OF COLORADANS AND OF
COLORADO'S INDUSTRIES;
(V) (VI) Creating a coordinated system to advance the skills and
educational attainment of Coloradans across workforce development and
education, in alignment with economic development goals, and in
partnership with industry ENSURING THAT PROVIDERS OF EDUCATION AND
TRAINING, WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT EXPERTS, ECONOMIC DEVELOPERS,
THE STATE, AND LOCAL COMMUNITIES HAVE A CLEAR UNDERSTANDING OF
THE LABOR MARKET AND THE STATE'S OCCUPATIONAL NEEDS is the most
promising way to advance Coloradans and supply industry with the talent
it demands;
(VI) (VII) Deep, authentic, and ongoing employer engagement and
input is ARE critical to ensure that education and training programs are
aligned with DESIGNED TO MEET the real and current needs of industry; and
(VII) (VIII) Sector partnerships are a proven, established model of
engaging employers and coordinating workforce development, economic
development, and education STRATEGIES in response to the needs of
industry and on behalf of workers INDIVIDUALS seeking good jobs.
(b) The general assembly further finds determines, and declares that
it will be IS beneficial to create a working group with the state council,
comprised of representatives from the relevant state departments and
offices, to discuss and determine the most effective way to use sector
partnerships at the regional level to align workforce development, economic
development, and education in the state to WITH the needs of key GROWING
industries AND IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS.
(2) The state council, the department of higher education, the
department of education, the department of labor and employment, and the
Colorado office of economic development shall work collaboratively to:
(a) Discuss and determine needs across key industries and ANALYZE
COLORADO'S LABOR MARKET CONDITIONS TO IDENTIFY GROWING
INDUSTRIES AND IN-DEMAND occupations including AND IDENTIFY
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-156

challenges TO and opportunities in FOR developing and growing relevant
talent pipelines;
(b) IDENTIFY THE IN-DEMAND AND HIGH-WAGE OCCUPATIONS IN
COLORADO THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR FEDERAL SUPPORT, AS DEFINED IN THE
FEDERAL "HIGHER EDUCATION ACT OF 1965", 20 U.S.C. SEC. 1001 ET SEQ.,
OR A SUCCESSOR ACT;
(b) (c) Ensure that the talent pipeline development infrastructure
includes:
(I) A listening process to collect workforce needs for key industries'
FEEDBACK ON OCCUPATIONAL DEMAND FROM employers;
(II) Curriculum alignment for high-demand occupation skill needs
ANALYSIS OF THE STATE'S CURRENT TRAINING CAPACITY AND ABILITY TO
SUPPORT WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FOR IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS;
(III) Occupation-aligned education and training options with a
clearly articulated progression ANALYSIS OF THE SKILLS ESSENTIAL FOR
IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS TO ASSIST TRAINING PROVIDERS IN MAINTAINING
THE RELEVANCE OF THEIR PROGRAMS; AND
(IV) Skills assessments; and
(V) (IV) Academic career counseling;
(c) (d) Utilize sector partnerships to:
(I) Advise the development of career pathway programs for critical
IN-DEMAND occupations in key GROWING industries; and
(II) Ensure the coordination of education and workforce initiatives
to develop a strong talent pipeline; and
(III) PROVIDE RESOURCES TO, PARTICIPATE IN, AND PROMOTE
CAREER EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES THAT ARE ALIGNED WITH IN-DEMAND
OCCUPATIONS, AS APPROPRIATE; AND
(d) (e) Utilize existing measures and data systems to improve
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-156

systems alignment and interagency communication.
(3) (a) In doing the work specified in subsection (2) of this section,
the state council, in partnership with the department of higher education, the
department of education, the department of labor and employment, and the
Colorado office of economic development, shall coordinate the production
of PRODUCE an annual Colorado talent report. In preparing the annual
Colorado talent report, the state council, the departments, and the office
may use previously collected data and are not required to collect new data.
for the purposes of the report. The talent report shall MUST:
(I) Take into consideration the data contained in the annual job skills
report produced by the department of higher education and use such data to
inform workforce development issues across key industries;
(II) (I) Utilize state-level data generated from state-level sources
whenever possible;
(III) (II) Utilize and, as appropriate, expand existing data-sharing
agreements between agencies and partners;
(IV) Provide a progress report on the status of career pathway
programs targeted at key industries;
(V) (III) Provide an analysis of data regarding the skills required for
key industry jobs IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS; AND
(VI) (IV) Include recommendations related to FOR advancing talent
pipeline and career pathways development.
(VII) Include recommendations regarding the alignment and
consistency of data nomenclature, collection practices, and data-sharing.
The recommendations shall not allow the disclosure of the personally
identifiable information of a student enrolled in kindergarten or one of
grades one through twelve without informed written permission from the
student's parent or legal guardian. The recommendations may disclose
de-identified, anonymous, or aggregate kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade
student data without permission from a parent or legal guardian.
(VIII) Repealed.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-156

(IX) Include the report regarding the industry infrastructure grant
program, prepared as required by section 24-46.3-405.
(b) The heads of the department of higher education, the department
of education, the department of labor and employment, and the Colorado
office of economic development shall include the recommendations from
the state council, and any comments they may wish to add concerning the
recommendations, to the house of representatives and senate committees of
reference with jurisdiction over business issues by January 1, 2015. The
heads of the departments shall annually present such recommendations and
comments during the legislative hearings required pursuant to the "State
Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART)
Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, C.R.S. MAY SHARE THEIR
ANALYSIS ON HOW DATA IN THE REPORT IMPACTS THE STATE'S STRATEGIC
GOALS THROUGH THEIR REGULAR REPORTING MECHANISMS.
(c) IN JANUARY OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AND EMPLOYMENT, AND THE COLORADO OFFICE OF ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT SHALL SUMMARIZE THE COLORADO TALENT REPORT, THEIR
RECOMMENDATIONS, AND OTHER COMMENTS IN A PRESENTATION TO THE
SENATE BUSINESS, LABOR, AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES BUSINESS AFFAIRS AND LABOR COMMITTEE, OR THEIR
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, DURING THE HEARINGS HELD PURSUANT TO THE
"SMART ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 2.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-46.3-104, amend
(1), (3)(a), (3)(b), (3)(c), (6), and (7); and repeal (2), (5), and (5.5) as
follows:
24-46.3-104. Career pathways - design - legislative declaration
- definition.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds that creating industry-driven
career pathways for education assists students in entering the work force
WORKFORCE and provides industries with the talent pipeline necessary to
fuel Colorado's economy. Recognizing the need for the coordinated
development of career pathways for students, the general assembly enacted
section 24-46.3-103 in 2014, tasking the state council to work
collaboratively with the department of higher education, the department of
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-156

education, the department of labor and employment, and the Colorado
office of economic development to create the talent pipeline development
infrastructure for use in creating ANALYZE COLORADO'S LABOR MARKET
CONDITIONS AND IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS TO INFORM THE CREATION AND
EVOLUTION OF career pathways for students. Creating career pathways for
growing Colorado industries with occupations in high demand JOB
PLACEMENT IN GROWING INDUSTRIES AND IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS will:
(a) Increase the number of Colorado citizens accessing
postsecondary education and apprenticeships IMPROVE EDUCATION AND
CAREER ADVISING AND NAVIGATION FOR COLORADANS INTERESTED IN
POSTSECONDARY OPPORTUNITIES DESIGNED TO MEET LABOR MARKET NEEDS;
(b) Increase the number of Colorado citizens COLORADANS
completing degrees, apprenticeships, and other credentials;
(c) Decrease the need for remediation at the postsecondary level;
(d) Increase entry into employment IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS and
increase wages over time;
(e) Create better transitions for students in the career pathways from
high school, community colleges, or adult education programs to
apprenticeships, higher education, or into the work force WORKFORCE;
(f) Create better connections between postsecondary EDUCATION and
work force WORKFORCE readiness initiatives in high school and adult work
force WORKFORCE programs; and
(g) Through partnerships with industry, assist students in obtaining
work experience and employment during and after THEIR participation in
TRAINING AND educational programs.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Apprenticeship" means a registered apprenticeship program
with a written plan that is designed to move an apprentice from a low- or
no-skill entry-level position to full occupational proficiency. The program
must comply with the parameters established under the "National
Apprenticeship Act", 29 U.S.C. sec. 50, as amended, and regulations
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-156

promulgated under the act, and must be administered by the United States
department of labor's office of apprenticeship or a state apprenticeship
agency recognized by the United States department of labor. An individual
business, an employer association, or a labor organization sponsors a
registered apprenticeship. Upon finishing a training program, the apprentice
earns a "completion of registered apprenticeship" certificate, which is an
industry-issued and nationally recognized credential that validates
proficiency in an apprenticeable occupation, or is awarded a certificate of
completion.
(b) "Career pathway" means a series of connected education and
training strategies and support services that enable individuals to secure
industry-relevant skills and certification where applicable, to obtain
employment within an occupational area, and to advance to higher levels of
future education and employment.
(b.5) "Certificate of completion" means a certificate awarded to an
apprentice in recognition of the successful completion of an apprenticeship
program.
(c) "Critical occupations" means top jobs or employment in jobs that
lead to top jobs.
(d) "Growing industries" means industries that are projected to
create new jobs annually for at least the next ten years.
(e) "Partners" means, at a minimum, state agencies and
organizations described in section 24-46.3-103, the state board for
community colleges and occupational education created in section
23-60-104, C.R.S., and interested postsecondary education providers.
(f) "State council" means the state work force development council
created in section 24-46.3-101.
(g) "Top jobs" means jobs that have strong projected average
openings per year for ten years and pay a living wage as defined in the
Colorado talent pipeline report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103.
(3) (a) The state council, in collaboration with its partners, and after
consulting with local work force WORKFORCE boards and a task force within
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-156

the department of education consisting of leadership from the department
of education and superintendents of local school districts, shall design,
MAINTAIN, AND UPDATE integrated career pathways for students within
industry sectors identified in the annual Colorado talent report prepared
pursuant to section 24-46.3-103 that are AS growing industries and that have
critical IN-DEMAND occupations. that are without clearly articulated career
pathways.
(b) (I) In collaboration with its partners pursuant to subsection (3)(a)
of this section, AND AT THE BEGINNING OF THE 2026-27 ACADEMIC YEAR
AND AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH ACADEMIC YEAR THEREAFTER, the state
council shall,
(A) Design at least one career pathway that is ready for
implementation by or before the 2016-17 academic year for critical
occupations in a growing industry; and
(B) subject to available appropriation or money from other sources,
design at least two OR UPDATE career pathways that are ready for
implementation at the beginning of each subsequent academic year for
critical IN-DEMAND occupations in growing industries.
(II) Based on the top jobs listing in the talent pipeline report
prepared in January 2014, the first three growing industries for design of a
career pathway are construction and related skilled trades, information
technology, and health care THE STATE COUNCIL SHALL CONTINUE TO WORK
TO IDENTIFY GROWING INDUSTRIES AND IN-DEMAND OCCUPATIONS THAT ARE
APPROPRIATE FOR CAREER PATHWAY DEVELOPMENT BASED ON THE DATA
PROVIDED IN THE ANNUAL COLORADO TALENT REPORT.
(c) Industry, through regional sector partnerships, and statewide
trade associations, AND OTHER APPROPRIATE COUNCILS OR ENTITIES, shall
review each career pathway annually to ensure that the career pathway
remains relevant to the industry and shall provide input for ongoing
adjustments to the career pathway to meet work force WORKFORCE needs.
(5) The state council and partners shall use the model developed to
create the manufacturing career pathway pursuant to section 23-60-1003,
C.R.S., including any improvements to the model based upon the
implementation of the manufacturing career pathway. Consistent with the
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-156

manufacturing career pathway, career pathways created pursuant to this
section must have the components described in section 23-60-1003 (2),
C.R.S., as they relate to the specific career pathway being created.
(5.5) (a) As used in this subsection (5.5), "energy sector" means
current and emerging establishments and partnerships engaged in
electromechanical generation and maintenance, electrical energy
transmission and distribution, energy efficiency and environmental
technology, and renewable energy production. The energy sector includes
but is not limited to occupations and activities relating to the development,
installation, and maintenance of products or technologies in the areas of
carbon capture, energy storage, building electrification, electric vehicles,
charging infrastructure, hydrogen fuel cell technology, and renewable
natural gas.
(b) The state council and partners, including the department of
natural resources, shall create an industry-driven energy sector career
pathway for implementation by or before the 2022-23 academic year. The
state council shall comply with the provisions of this section, including
career pathway design, components, implementation, industry review, and
promotion of the energy sector career pathway.
(c) The strengthening photovoltaic and renewable careers (SPARC)
workforce development program, created in part 5 of this article 46.3, shall
provide money and other supports for in-demand and growing occupations
in the energy sector career pathway created pursuant to this subsection (5.5).
(6) Once a career pathway is completed pursuant to this section, the
state council, IN COORDINATION WITH PARTNER AGENCIES, TRADE
ASSOCIATIONS, AND OTHER COUNCILS OR ENTITIES, shall facilitate outreach
and training related to advising TO ADVISE students on the career pathways
for all partners involved in implementing the career pathway, as well as
other local, regional, or state entities that are interested in promoting the
career pathway to students.
(7) (a) Once a career pathway is completed pursuant to this section,
the state council shall, subject to available appropriation or money from
other sources, collaborate with the department of higher education and the
department of labor and employment to create a microsite concerning
PUBLISH the career pathway on a state-provided, free online resource. At a
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-156

minimum, the following information must be included:
(I) Industry-sector career awareness;
(II) Salary and wage information for the industry-sector career;
(III) The industry-sector employment forecast;
(IV) Information on programs within the career pathway, services
provided, and financial aid opportunities for students; and
(V) Online student support services.
(b) ACADEMIC INSTITUTIONS MAY, IN DESIGNING OR UPDATING
PROGRAMS:
(I) INTEGRATE CAREER PATHWAYS INTO STUDENT ADVISING AND
ACADEMIC PLANNING;
(II) ALIGN ACADEMIC AND TRAINING PROGRAMS TO PROVIDE CLEAR
CURRICULAR SEQUENCES THAT LEAD TO STACKABLE, INDUSTRY-RECOGNIZED
CREDENTIALS; AND
(III) EMBED ALIGNED, WORK-BASED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES AS AN
INTEGRAL COMPONENT OF THE STUDENT EXPERIENCE IN COLLABORATION
WITH INDUSTRY.
(b) (c) The state council may use money appropriated by the general
assembly pursuant to section 24-46.3-101 (13) or money from any other
source to add additional information and tools to a THE ONLINE PLATFORM
THAT PROMOTES career pathways. microsite, similar to the information and
tools provided in the microsite relating to the manufacturing career
pathway.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-46.3-302, amend
(1) and (2)(a) as follows:
24-46.3-302. Postsecondary and workforce readiness statewide
coordinator - position created - duties.
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-156

(1) (a) There is created the position of postsecondary and work force
WORKFORCE readiness statewide coordinator to work under the direction of
the state work force development council. The statewide coordinator works
SHALL WORK with and helps to HELP coordinate the efforts of local
education providers, businesses, industry, area technical colleges,
community colleges, apprenticeship programs, the department of education,
the work force development STATE council, the career and technical
education division within the Colorado community college system, the
department of higher education, college preparation programs, and other
appropriate entities to raise the level of postsecondary and work force
WORKFORCE readiness that Colorado high school graduates achieve HAVE
ACCESS TO, especially with regard to readiness upon high school graduation,
for skilled career positions in business and industry, INCLUSIVE OF
INDICATORS IDENTIFIED IN THE SCHOOL ACCOUNTABILITY FRAMEWORK.
(b) The executive committee of the state work force development
council shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
commissioner of education as necessary to enable the statewide coordinator
to collaborate with the office of postsecondary readiness and other
appropriate offices and divisions within the department of education in
implementing initiatives to increase the level of postsecondary and work
force WORKFORCE readiness that high school graduates achieve.
(2) (a) The statewide coordinator shall assist local WORKFORCE
CENTERS AND education providers in:
(I) Developing and implementing initiatives to increase the level of
postsecondary and work force WORKFORCE readiness OPPORTUNITIES that
high school graduates achieve, which may include but need not be limited
to HAVE ACCESS TO, INCLUDING specialized, industry-based curricula and
programs; apprenticeship programs; and internships and externships;
(II) Implementing concurrent enrollment programs as provided in
article 35 of title 22, C.R.S., and in entering into concurrent enrollment
agreements with area technical colleges, community colleges, and four-year
institutions of higher education;
(III) (II) Identifying local industry and work force WORKFORCE
needs and existing educational tools, programs, and resources to help
prepare middle and high school students to meet those needs upon
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-156

graduating from high school;
(IV) (III) Working with state and federal programs that provide
career and work force WORKFORCE development opportunities for AND
OUT-OF-SCHOOL YOUTH AND students enrolled in middle and high school
and in accessing any state or federal moneys that are MONEY THAT IS
available to local education providers to support and implement the
programs;
(V) (IV) Promoting opportunities for industry to engage in the
classroom with students enrolled in grades six through twelve AND
OUT-OF-SCHOOL YOUTH; AND
(VI) Engaging students with the manufacturing career pathway
created pursuant to section 23-60-1003, C.R.S.; and
(VII) (V) Developing partnerships with businesses, industry,
INDUSTRIES, unions, area technical colleges, community colleges,
apprenticeship programs, and other entities to create opportunities for
students to participate in educational and training programs that lead to
obtaining a career entry-level credential THE SKILLS, CREDENTIALS, AND
EXPERIENCE NECESSARY TO OBTAIN EMPLOYMENT IN IN-DEMAND
OCCUPATIONS IN COLORADO.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-46.3-303 as
follows:
24-46.3-303. Annual report.
The state work force development council and the department of
education shall annually review the work of the statewide coordinator in
implementing the duties described in section 24-46.3-302, AND SUCH
REVIEW SHALL INCLUDE SPECIFIC METRICS AND DATA THAT DEMONSTRATE
THE PROGRESS AND GROWTH OF THE STATEWIDE COORDINATOR. The state
work force development council shall include a summary of the review in
the Colorado talent report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103 (3).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-43.7-109, amend
(14) as follows:
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-156

22-43.7-109. Financial assistance for public school capital
construction - application requirements - evaluation criteria - local
match requirements - technology grants - career and technical
education capital construction grants - rules - definitions - repeal.
(14) For fiscal year 2019-20 and for each succeeding fiscal year, the
board, with the support of the division and subject to the approval of the
state board regarding financial assistance awards as specified in this section,
may provide financial assistance in the form of career and technical
education capital construction grants. In conjunction with its establishment
of an annual financial assistance timeline as required by subsection (2)(a)
of this section, the board shall annually notify all potential applicants, by
such means as the board deems appropriate, that it will accept and consider
applications for financial assistance in the form of career and technical
education capital construction grants. To be eligible for a career and
technical education capital construction grant, an applicant for financial
assistance must apply specifically for that grant in accordance with the
financial assistance timeline established by the board pursuant to subsection
(2)(a) of this section and must submit an application in the form prescribed
by the board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. The board may
award career and technical education capital construction grants to fund
career and technical education capital construction projects. In awarding
grants, the board shall consider whether each grant application describes a
career and technical education capital construction project that concerns a
professional field that is identified as a key GROWING industry in the most
recent annual Colorado talent report produced by the state work force
development council pursuant to section 24-46.3-103 (3). Nothing in this
subsection (14) prohibits the board from considering other factors in
awarding and denying career and technical education capital construction
grants.
SECTION 7. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) To implement this act, the general fund appropriation made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of labor and employment for use by the division of employment
and training for workforce development council is decreased by $46,605.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-156

(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of labor and employment for use by the division of employment and training
for workforce development council is less than the amount of the
adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of labor and
employment for use by the division of employment and training for
workforce development council.
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,2026); except that section
7 of this act takes effect only if the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which case section 7 takes effect
upon the effective date of this act or of the annual general appropriation act
for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later, and except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-156

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-156